South Dakota, session 2026, HB1297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $125,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Transportation, to provide for a study of statewide transit needs and the economic impacts of
public transit. The study must examine whether public transit contributes to workforce
availability, and whether public transit affects medicaid spending, institutional placement, and
healthcare utilization.
The Department of Transportation must present its findings and any recommendations in a
report to the Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council on or before November 30,
2026.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Transportation shall approve vouchers and
the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.